Utah statutes.
63B-8-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Bond anticipation note" means a note issued in anticipation of the
receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under Part 2 of
this chapter.
(2)  "Flexible note" means a bond anticipation note whose interest is payable
at maturity, and may be payable on one or more dates before maturity.
(3) (a)  "Short-term series note" means a bond anticipation note that is one
of a series of notes issued pursuant to a financing program under which it is
expected that:
(i)  each note will be paid from the proceeds of one or more renewal notes of
that series; and
(ii)  the final note or notes of the series will be paid from:
(A)  the proceeds of bonds in anticipation of the receipt of which the note or
notes were issued; or
(B)  money of the state on hand and legally available for that purpose.
(b)  "Short-term series note" includes any note issued pursuant to a revolving
credit agreement or other similar liquidity facility for the purpose of
renewing or paying outstanding short-term series notes on their stated
maturity dates when those short-term series notes are not renewed or paid from
the proceeds of one or more other renewal notes of the series.
